Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.180

Education of students in the custody of juvenile rehabilitation facilities—Duties—Creation of a comprehensive plan.

(1) The department shall meet regularly with the school districts that educate students who are in the custody of medium and maximum security facilities operated by juvenile rehabilitation to help coordinate activities in areas of common interest, such as communication with parents. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall facilitate upon request of the department.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in collaboration with the department, shall create a comprehensive plan for the education of students in juvenile rehabilitation and provide it to the governor and relevant committees of the legislature by September 1, 2020.

[ 2019 c 322 s 7.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2019 c 322: See note following RCW 72.01.410.